Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.900

Application of chapter to annexations involving water or sewer service.

Nothing in this chapter precludes or otherwise applies to an annexation by a city or town of unincorporated territory as authorized by RCW 57.24.170, 57.24.190, and 57.24.210.

[ 1996 c 230 s 1601; 1995 c 279 s 3.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 230: See notes following RCW 57.02.001.